Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1227.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(d) of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1363, No.100), known as the Crane Operator Licensure Act, is amended to read:Section 301. Board.* * *(d) Term of membership.--Professional and public members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Professional and public members shall be [citizens of the United States and] residents of this Commonwealth. Except as provided in subsection (e), professional and public members shall serve a term of four years or until a 1234567891011121314151617181920 successor has been appointed and qualified but in no event longer than six months beyond the four-year period. In the event that a member dies or resigns or otherwise is disqualified during the term of office, a successor shall be appointed in the same way and with the same qualifications and shall hold office for an unexpired term. A professional or public member shall not be eligible to hold more than two consecutive terms.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1227PN1443 - 2 - 123456789